apertium-sei.sei.twol
Alphabet 

a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o ö p q r s t u v w x y z 

%{O%}:o
%{I%}:i
%{i%}:i %{i%}:0

%>:0

;

Sets

Vow = a e i o u ;

Rules

"Vowel harmony with {O}- prefix"
a:Vx <=> Vy: %>: _ ;
     where Vx in ( o i ) 
           Vy in ( %{O%} %{I%} ) 
     matched ; 

"Elision of {O} before vowel"
%{O%}:0 <=> _ %>: [ Vow - a ] ; 
